Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2508.01
Mechanical modality, defined.

Mechanical modality means the therapeutic use of a mechanical device to apply force, such as compression, distraction, vibration, or controlled mobilization, to modify biomechanical properties and functions of tissues.

Laws 2025, LB257, § 22.